zh-TW: 磁碟格式類型: 藍光; CD; DVD; USB; 其他
vi: Loại định dạng đĩa: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Khác
pl: Typ formatu dysku: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Inne
el: Τύπος μορφής δίσκου: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Άλλο
nl: Schijfformaattype: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Andere
fi: Levyformaattityyppi: Blu-rayt; CD; DVD; USB; Muu
bg-BG: Тип формат на диска: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Други
ru: Тип диска: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Другой
nb: Diskformattype: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Annet
sv: Diskformattyp: Bluray; CD; DVD; USB; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta formata diska: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Drugo
ko: 디스크 형식 유형: 블루레이; CD; DVD; USB; 기타
cs: Typ formátu disku: Blu-ray disky; CD; DVD; USB; Jiné
th: ประเภทรูปแบบดิสก์: บลูเรย์; CD; DVD; USB; อื่นๆ
ja: ディスクフォーマットタイプ: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; その他
fr: Type de format du disque: Blu Ray; CD; DVD; USB; Autre
zh-CN: 磁盘格式类型: 蓝光; CD; DVD; USB; 其他
tr: Disk Formatı Türü: Bluray; CD; DVD; USB; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ formátu disku: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Iné
da: Diskformattype: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Andet
hu: Lemezformátum típusa: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta formata diska: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de formato de disco: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de format de disc: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Altele
lt-LT: Disko formato tipas: „Blu-ray“; CD; DVD; USB; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de formato do disco: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Outro
it: Tipo di formato del disco: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Altro
de: Diskettenformattyp: Blu-Ray; CD; DVD; USB; Sonstiges
en: Disk format type: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Other
es: Tipo de formato de disco: Blu-ray; CD; DVD; USB; Otros